Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 8 Parole

13-8-1.
Parole board — Appointment and terms of members.

Within the department of corrections there shall be a parole board consisting of seven (7) qualified electors of the state appointed by the governor. In the month of January in each year, the governor shall appoint one or more members of the board to serve in place of members whose terms have expired, for a term of three (3) years, and until his, her, or their successors have been appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 868, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1304, § 1; P. L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 28, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 262, § 1.

13-8-2.
Qualifications of board members.

The seven (7) electors to be named by the governor shall have the following qualifications:

One of the qualified electors shall be a psychologist or a physician who is professionally qualified in the field of psychiatry or neurology;

One shall be a member in good standing of the Rhode Island bar;

One shall be a person who is professionally trained in correctional work or in some closely related general field as a social work; and

One shall be a law enforcement officer;

All of the qualified electors shall be individuals who shall also have shown an interest in social welfare problems.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 617, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 262, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 481, § 1.

13-8-3.
Chairperson of board — Liberty permits.

The governor shall appoint a qualified elector of this state chairperson of the parole board, who shall serve in the unclassified service as a fulltime employee for a term of two (2) years and until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified.

All remaining members of the board shall also be in the unclassified service.

The chairperson shall be an individual who has experience in the criminal justice system and shall have earned a baccalaureate degree.

The chairperson shall have authority to create subcommittees of at least three (3) members of the parole board who shall serve on a rotating basis. The subcommittee may, in the case of any prisoner who is subject to the control of the parole board, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the subcommittee members, unless the prisoner is sentenced to imprisonment for life and unless the prisoner is confined as a habitual criminal under the provisions of §

12-19-21

, issue to the prisoner a permit to be at liberty upon parole as if the permit were issued by the full board pursuant to the provisions of §

13-8-9

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1304, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-3

; P.L. 1978, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 262, § 3.

13-8-3.1.
Subpoena powers of board.

Upon a specific demand made by either party to a preliminary or final parole revocation, the parole board is authorized and empowered to summon witnesses and to compel the production and examination of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates and other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question before the board at the hearing.

Both parties to a preliminary or final parole revocation hearing shall be informed of the right to compulsory process sufficiently in advance of the hearing to allow the parole board to effectuate that right in accordance with this section.

Nothing in this statute shall be deemed to modify or supercede existing or common law privilege, including the confidential informant privilege.

All subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum shall be signed by the chairperson or, in the absence or disqualification of the chairperson, by any other member of the parole board, and shall be served as subpoenas are now served in civil cases in the superior court; and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are now provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court.

If any person fails to obey the command of any subpoena without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the board shall, without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn or examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, the board may apply to any justice of the superior court, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) or more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for a hearing shall examine the person under oath and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard. If the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records and documents material to the issue, which he or she was ordered to bring or produce, the justice may immediately commit the person to the adult correctional institutions, thereto remain until he or she submits to do the act which he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law. If an application of contempt pursuant to this section relates to the actions of a witness at a public hearing, then the papers filed with and proceedings before the court shall be open to the public; otherwise, these papers and proceedings shall be confidential.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 367, § 1.

13-8-4.
Facilities and supplies for board.

The director of corrections shall provide adequate quarters for the board for the purpose of holding meetings and shall provide space and facilities for the keeping of records for the board, together with the necessary equipment and supplies incident to the maintenance of the board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 11; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-4

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9.

13-8-5.
Staffing of parole board.

The director of corrections shall provide the board with an administrator, an investigator, a clerk, a psychologist(s), whose sole function within the department of corrections shall be to consult with the board, and the necessary stenographic service. Staff salaries shall be paid from the appropriation of the department of corrections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 12; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-5

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 140, § 1.

13-8-6.
Duties of administrator — Case folders.

The duties of the administrator shall include the following:

To administer the office of the parole board;

To supervise the collection of data for each applicant for parole;

To summarize collected data and prepare a folder on each applicant for parole, including the summary of the information collected from the above sources, or any other sources which are deemed appropriate, together with the original supporting documents, and all communications addressed to the board and its members concerning the applicant for parole;

To maintain, in the folder of each applicant, the report of the board provided for in §

13-8-23

;

To arrange for each meeting of the board;

To prepare all reports required of the board;

To send to the state and local police a list of all persons, including their date of birth and last known address prior to incarceration, lead offenses, and the name of the police department which prosecuted the person, whose application for parole is to be considered by the board, not less than six (6) weeks prior to the meeting to consider the applications, so that the state police and the local police departments may return any comment deemed appropriate at least two (2) weeks prior to the scheduled meeting; and to make a reasonable effort to notify the victim of the crime committed by the prisoner, or, in homicide cases, the victim’s next of kin, and/or, in cases where the victim is a minor, the victim’s parent and/or legal guardian, not less than thirty (30) days prior to the meeting, of his or her right to provide a victim impact statement to the board;

For the purposes of this subdivision the following words and phrases have the following meanings:

“Victim” means an individual who has suffered direct or threatened physical, emotional, or financial harm as the result of the commission of a crime, or an immediate family member of a minor or a homicide victim.

“Victim impact statement” means a statement providing information about the financial, emotional, and physical effects of a crime on the victim and the victim’s family, and specific information about the victim, the circumstances surrounding the crime, and the manner in which it was perpetrated.

To furnish the attorney general, the state police, and the local police departments set forth in §

13-8-9.1

with a photograph (or a reasonable facsimile) of each prisoner released, taken at the time of his or her release on parole;

To notify the police department of the town or city in which the prisoner resided before sentence and the police department of the city or town in which he or she is to reside, at least five (5) days prior to the release of any prisoner on parole, of the release;

To have published in a newspaper of general circulation, once a month, the names of the persons whose applications for parole are to be considered within the upcoming month and the hearing date or dates of the applications;

To prepare a list of all individuals released by the board;

To maintain that list in the permanent files of the office of the board, which list shall be a public record;

To confer with the director of corrections on all matters relating to the activities of the board; and

To perform related duties as required.

Case folders shall be made available to each member of the board not less than a week prior to its meeting to interview applicants for parole and shall be maintained in the permanent files of the board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 12; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-6

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1983, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 140, § 1.

13-8-6.1.
Notice to local police departments and to state police.

The parole board shall provide notice to the state and local police departments upon the release of a prisoner on parole, as provided in §§

13-8-6

and

13-8-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 215, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 319, § 1.

13-8-7.
Expenses of board.

The members of the parole board shall be entitled to receive the traveling expenses necessarily incurred in the performance by them of any duty under this chapter. The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to defray the expenses of the board, including the traveling expenses of its members. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her order or orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of those expenses upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers duly authenticated and approved by the chairperson.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, §§ 10, 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, §§ 10, 11; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, §§ 10, 11; P.L. 1943, ch. 1304, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 14; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-7

.

13-8-8.
Sentences subject to control of board.

Whenever a person convicted of any offense shall be sentenced to be imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions for a period of more than six (6) months, his or her sentence shall be subject to the control of the parole board as provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 2; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2466, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-8

.

13-8-9.
Issuance of parole.

The parole board, in the case of any prisoner whose sentence is subject to its control, unless that prisoner is sentenced to imprisonment for life, and unless that prisoner is confined as a habitual criminal under the provisions of §

12-19-21

, may, by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board, issue to that prisoner a permit to be at liberty upon parole, whenever that prisoner has served not less than one-third (1/3) of the term for which he or she was sentenced. The permit shall entitle the prisoner to whom it is issued to be at liberty during the remainder of his or her term of sentence upon any terms and conditions that the board may prescribe.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, in the case of a conviction for a first- or second-degree murder committed after July 1, 2015, when the prisoner has not been sentenced to life, the prisoner shall not be eligible for a parole permit until he or she has served at least fifty-percent (50%) of his or her sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 868, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 2; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-9

; P.L. 2015, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 285, § 1.

13-8-9.1.
Notification upon release.

The parole board shall, immediately prior to the release of any prisoner on parole, notify:

The victim of the crime committed by the prisoner, or in homicide cases a member of the immediate family of the victim if any can be identified; and

The police department in the community where the crime for which the prisoner was sentenced was committed, the police department in the community where the prisoner was residing at the time of the commission of the offense, and the police department in the community where the prisoner will be residing upon his or her release.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 14, § 1.

13-8-10.
Prisoners subject to more than one sentence.

If a prisoner is confined upon more than one sentence, a parole permit may be issued whenever he or she has served a term equal to one-third (1/3) of the aggregate time which he or she shall be liable to serve under his or her several sentences, unless he or she has been sentenced to serve two (2) or more terms concurrently, in which case the permit shall be issued when he or she has served a term equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum term he or she is required to serve.

If a prisoner, whether in confinement or on parole, is sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment for an offense which was committed after imposition of the sentence then being served, a permit may not be issued until he or she has served in confinement at least one-third (1/3) of the term of imprisonment to which he or she is sentenced for the subsequent offense. In calculating the date the prisoner shall become eligible for a permit, the time spent in confinement on an earlier imposed concurrent sentence shall not be credited for the purposes of parole eligibility on the subsequent sentence. In the event a prisoner is convicted of two (2) or more subsequent offenses and is sentenced to multiple terms of imprisonment for those offenses, the standards contained in subsection (a) of this section shall be used to determine when he or she has served one-third (1/3) of the terms of confinement imposed for the subsequent offenses and thereby is eligible for issuance of a permit under this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 868, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 2; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-10

; P.L. 1979, ch. 394, § 1.

13-8-11.
Good conduct, industrial, and meritorious service time.

In computing the one-third (1/3) of any term of sentence for the purpose of §§

13-8-9

—

13-8-14

, the time a prisoner shall have earned pursuant to §§

42-56-24

and

42-56-26

shall be considered by the parole board to reduce inmate overcrowding when directed by the criminal justice oversight committee, pursuant to the provisions of §

42-26-13.3(e)

, or when directed by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

42-26-13.3(f)

.

As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:

“Compliance,” the absence of a finding by a parole officer or the parole board of a violation of the terms or conditions of a permit or conditions of parole supervision set by the Rhode Island parole board.

“Compliance credits,” credits that an eligible offender earns through compliance with parole board-ordered conditions of parole supervision; provided, however, that the credits shall operate to reduce the length of parole supervision.

“Eligible parolee,” any offender who is currently serving a term of post-incarceration parole supervision except any such person serving a sentence of a violation of § 11-5-1 (where the specified felony is murder or sexual assault), §

11-23-1

, §

11-26-1.4

, §

11-37-2

, §

11-37-8.1

, or §

11-37-8.3

.

On the first day of each calendar month after July 1, 2021, an eligible parolee shall earn five (5) days of compliance credits if the eligible parolee served on parole without any documented behavior that could constitute a violation of the terms and conditions of parole for the prior calendar month. Any compliance credits so granted and not rescinded pursuant to guidelines set forth by the parole board shall reduce the period of time that a parolee is subject to the jurisdiction of the parole board under §

13-8-9

.

The parole board shall issue guidelines governing the awarding of compliance credits; any disqualifiers to the earning of compliance credits; and the rescission or suspension of compliance credits as applicable.

The award or rescission of credits pursuant to this section shall not be the subject of judicial review.

This section shall apply to all individuals sentenced to imprisonment and subsequently granted parole including those sentences granted prior to passage of this legislation and shall not alter the ability of the parole board to revoke parole. The calculation of compliance credits shall be prospective from the date of passage, while eligibility to earn compliance credits shall be prospective and retrospective.

The department of corrections shall keep a record of the eligible parolee’s sentence, including the person’s end of supervision date based on earned credits for compliance with the terms and conditions of parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 868, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 2; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 108, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

13-8-12.
Repealed.

13-8-13.
Life prisoners and prisoners with lengthy sentences.

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life, a parole permit may be issued at any time after the prisoner has served not less than ten (10) years’ imprisonment; provided that:

In the case of a prisoner serving a sentence or sentences of a length making him or her ineligible for a permit in less than ten (10) years, pursuant to §§

13-8-9

and

13-8-10

, the permit may be issued at any time after the prisoner has served not less than ten (10) years’ imprisonment;

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree murder committed after July 10, 1989, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than fifteen (15) years’ imprisonment;

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree murder committed after June 30, 1995, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty (20) years’ imprisonment;

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a first- or second-degree murder committed after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty-five (25) years’ imprisonment; and

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life for a crime, other than first- or second-degree murder, committed after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty (20) years’ imprisonment.

The permit shall be issued only by a unanimous vote of all the attending members of the board; provided that not less than four (4) members are present, and whenever, after the issue of the permit, the prisoner shall be pardoned, then the control of the board over the prisoner shall cease and terminate.

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life who is convicted of escape or attempted escape from the lawful custody of the warden of the adult correctional institutions, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty-five (25) years’ imprisonment; provided, however, that as to a prisoner who has been sentenced to imprisonment for life for a conviction of first- or second-degree murder, committed after July 1, 2015, and who is convicted thereafter of escape or attempted escape from the lawful custody of the warden of the adult correctional institutions, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than thirty-five (35) years’ imprisonment; and

For each subsequent conviction of escape or attempted escape, an additional five (5) years shall be added to the time required to be served.

In the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes occurring after May 7, 1981, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than ten (10) years consecutively on each life sentence; provided, in the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes occurring after June 30, 1995, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than fifteen (15) years consecutively on each life sentence. In the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes occurring after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty (20) years consecutively on each life sentence. In the case of a prisoner sentenced consecutively to more than one life term for crimes, including first- or second-degree murder, occurring after July 1, 2015, the permit may be issued only after the prisoner has served not less than twenty-five (25) years consecutively on each life sentence.

Any person sentenced for any offense committed prior to his or her twenty-second birthday, other than a person serving life without parole, shall be eligible for parole review and a parole permit may be issued after the person has served no fewer than twenty (20) years’ imprisonment unless the person is entitled to earlier parole eligibility pursuant to any other provisions of law. This subsection shall be given prospective and retroactive effect for all offenses occurring on or after January 1, 1991.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 868, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1933, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-13

; P.L. 1960, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

13-8-14.
Release criteria.

A permit shall not be issued to any prisoner under the authority of §§

13-8-9

-13-8-13 unless it shall appear to the parole board:

That the prisoner has substantially observed the rules of the institution in which confined, as evidenced by reports submitted to the board by the director of the department of corrections, or his or her designated representatives, in a form to be prescribed by the director;

That release would not depreciate the seriousness of the prisoner’s offense or promote disrespect for the law;

That there is a reasonable probability that the prisoner, if released, would live and remain at liberty without violating the law;

That the prisoner can properly assume a role in the city or town in which he or she is to reside. In assessing the prisoner’s role in the community the board shall consider:

Whether or not the prisoner has employment;

The location of his or her residence and place of employment; and

The needs of the prisoner for special services, including but not limited to, specialized medical care and rehabilitative services; and

That any and all restitution imposed pursuant to §

12-19-32

has been paid in full, or satisfactory arrangements have been made with the court if the person has the ability to pay. Any agreement shall be in writing and it is the burden of the person seeking parole to satisfy the parole board that this requirement has been met. Any person subject to the provisions of this section may request an ability to pay hearing, by filing the request with the court which imposed the original sentence.

In the case of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment for life who is released on parole and who is subsequently convicted of a crime of violence as defined in §

11-47-2

, the conviction shall constitute an automatic revocation of parole and the prisoner shall not be eligible for parole thereafter.

In the case of a prisoner convicted of a crime of violence as defined in §

11-47-2

and subsequently released on parole, should the prisoner, while on parole, commit an offense which results in a sentence of imprisonment for life, the conviction shall constitute an automatic revocation of parole and the prisoner shall not thereafter be eligible for parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 223, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 94, § 2.

13-8-14.1.
Parole standards.

At least once each calendar year the parole board shall adopt standards to be utilized by the board in evaluating applications for parole of persons convicted of a criminal offense and sentenced to the adult correctional institutions. These standards shall establish, with the range of parole eligibility set by statute, the portion of a sentence which should be served depending on the likelihood of recidivism as determined by a risk assessment, and shall serve as guidelines for the board in making individual parole determinations.

The board shall consider the applicable standard prior to rendering a decision on a parole application, and may make a determination at variance with that standard only upon a finding that the determination is warranted by individualized factors, such as the character, criminal history, and attitudes of the applicant that bear on the likelihood to reoffend, the conduct of the applicant while incarcerated, including meaningful participation in a risk-reducing program and substantial compliance with the rules of the institution, and risk-reducing behavior and the criteria set forth in §

13-8-14

. “Risk-reducing program” means a program that adheres to those elements that are shown in research to reduce recidivism.

In each case where the board grants an application prior to the time set by the applicable standard or denies an application on or after the time set by that standard, the board shall set forth in writing the rationale for its determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 375, § 10; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 22; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 352, § 1.

13-8-14.2.
Special parole consideration for persons convicted as juveniles.

When a person who is serving a sentence imposed as the result of an offense or offenses committed when he or she was less than eighteen years of age becomes eligible for parole pursuant to applicable provisions of law, the parole board shall ensure that he or she is provided a meaningful opportunity to obtain release and shall adopt rules and guidelines to do so, consistent with existing law.

During a parole hearing involving a person described in subsection (a) of this section, in addition to other factors required by law or under the parole guidelines set forth by the parole board, the parole board shall also take into consideration the diminished culpability of juveniles as compared to that of adults and any subsequent growth and increased maturity of the prisoner during incarceration. The board shall also consider the following:

A review of educational and court documents;

Participation in available rehabilitative and educational programs while in prison;

Age at the time of the offense;

Immaturity at the time of the offense;

Home and community environment at the time of the offense;

Efforts made toward rehabilitation;

Evidence of remorse; and

Any other factors or circumstances the board considers relevant.

The parole board shall have access to all relevant records and information in the possession of any state official or agency relating to the board’s consideration of the factors detailed in the foregoing sections.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 2, effective July 6, 2021.

13-8-15.
[Obsolete.]

13-8-16.
Terms of parole.

Every permit issued by the parole board under this chapter shall entitle the prisoner to whom it is issued to be at liberty upon parole during the remainder of the term which he or she is under sentence to serve, upon any terms and conditions that the board may see fit in its discretion to prescribe, and the acceptance of the permit by the prisoner shall constitute an agreement on the part of the prisoner to abide by and conform to those terms and conditions.

When a prisoner is released on parole to serve a sentence in another state, the board shall request that the receiving state notify the board immediately upon the prisoner’s release from the correctional facility in the receiving state. The executive secretary of the board shall, within five (5) days of receipt of the notice, notify the state police and the local police departments as set forth in §

13-8-9.1

of the release of the prisoner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3129, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-16

; P.L. 1983, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 319, § 1.

13-8-16.1.
Terms of parole — Certain drug offenses.

Every person who shall be placed on parole for a violation of any section of chapter 28 of title 21 prohibiting the unlawful sale, distribution, manufacturing, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, distribute, or deliver any controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II in chapter 28 of title 21, or possession of a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II in chapter 28 of title 21, shall, as a condition of parole, be required to, at his or her own expense, submit to drug testing in accordance with the standards and procedures of the department of health, not less than once per month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 457, § 3.

13-8-17.
Reports and control by division of field services.

For the duration of the prisoner’s parole, the assistant director of field services or his or her designee shall report on the adjustment of the parolee to the parole board at the end of each six (6) months of parole.

If at any time there is evidence of a violation of any of the conditions of the parole, the assistant director of field services or his or her designee shall report the violation immediately and fully to the board, together with a recommendation concerning the action to be taken by the board with respect to the parole.

In those instances of violation, the assistant director of field services or his or her designee may in his or her discretion return the parolee to the institution from which he or she was paroled, pending action by the board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 5; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3129, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-17

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 5.

13-8-18.
Revocation of parole — Hearing.

The parole board may, by a majority vote of all of its members, revoke, in accordance with the provisions of §

13-8-18.1

, any permit issued by it to any prisoner under the provisions of this chapter or revoke any permit issued by another state or jurisdiction where the prisoner is being supervised by the Rhode Island parole board whenever it shall appear to the board that the prisoner has violated any of the terms or conditions of his or her permit or conditions of parole set by an out-of-state jurisdiction, or has during the period of his or her parole violated any state laws. Whenever it shall come to the knowledge of the board that any prisoner at liberty under a permit issued by this state or another state or jurisdiction has been guilty of a violation of parole related to a new criminal charge, the chairperson shall issue his or her warrant to any officer authorized to serve criminal process to arrest the prisoner and commit him or her to the adult correctional institutions, to be detained until the board shall have an opportunity to determine whether the permit of the prisoner is to be revoked in accordance with the provisions of §

13-8-18.1

, or in the case of prisoners granted parole by another state or jurisdiction, and supervised by the Rhode Island parole board, until that state or jurisdiction takes custody of the prisoner. Whenever it shall come to the knowledge of the board that any prisoner at liberty under a permit issued by this state or another state or jurisdiction has been guilty of a technical violation of parole, absent a new criminal charge, the chairperson may, at his or her discretion, issue his or her warrant to any officer authorized to serve criminal process to arrest the prisoner and commit him or her to the adult correctional institutions, to be detained until the board shall have an opportunity to determine whether the permit of the prisoner is to be revoked in accordance with the provisions of § 13-8-18.1, or in the case of prisoners granted parole by another state or jurisdiction, and supervised by the Rhode Island parole board, until that state or jurisdiction takes custody of the prisoner. If the board shall determine that the permit shall not be revoked, then the board shall immediately order the prisoner to be set at liberty under the terms and conditions of his or her original permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3129, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-18

; P.L. 2003, ch. 209, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.